Hawaii statutes.
§346-59.9 Psychotropic medication. (a)
This section shall apply only to the medicaid managed care and fee-for-service
programs administered by the department when the department or the department's
contracted health plan is the primary insurer. When the department is the
secondary insurer, the department and its contracted health plans shall be
responsible only for the secondary insurer’s share of any psychotropic
medication covered by the primary insurer.

(b) The department and its contracted health
plans shall not impose any restriction or limitation on the coverage for, or a
recipient's access to, antipsychotic medication.

(c) The department and its contracted health
plans shall not impose any restriction or limitation on the coverage for, or a
recipient's access to, antidepressant medication other than:

(1) Requiring that an individual must have two failed
attempts on a generic antidepressant medication to receive coverage for a new
brand-name antidepressant prescription; and

(2) Requiring that if an individual does not have two
failed attempts on a generic antidepressant medication, that individual shall
receive coverage for a brand-name antidepressant medication with prior
authorization by the contracted health plan; provided that while a prior
authorization request for a brand-name antidepressant medication submitted by
the prescriber is pending, a supply of the prescribed medication sufficient to
last until the request is resolved shall be covered if requested by the
prescriber.

For purposes of this subsection, a "failed
attempt" means that the prescribed generic antidepressant medication up to
the maximum FDA-approved dosage is not effective in treating the individual, or
the individual's compliance is compromised due to the side effects caused by
the medication.

(d) The department and its contracted health
plans shall not impose any restriction or limitation on the coverage for, or a
recipient's access to, anti-anxiety medication other than:

(1) Requiring that an individual must have two failed
attempts on a generic anti-anxiety medication to receive coverage for a new
brand-name anti-anxiety prescription; and

(2) Requiring that if an individual does not have two
failed attempts on a generic anti-anxiety medication, that individual shall receive
coverage for a brand-name anti-anxiety medication with prior authorization by
the contracted health plan; provided that while a prior authorization request
for a brand-name anti-anxiety medication submitted by the prescriber is
pending, a supply of the prescribed medication sufficient to last until the
request is resolved shall be covered if requested by the prescriber.

For purposes of this subsection, a "failed
attempt" means that the prescribed generic anti-anxiety medication up to
the maximum FDA-approved dosage is not effective in treating the individual, or
the individual's compliance is compromised due to the side effects caused by
the medication.

(e) The department and its contracted health
plans shall not require any individual stable on a brand-name antidepressant
medication on or before July 1, 2010, to transfer to a different antidepressant
medication, generic or brand-name, unless the individual's condition becomes
unstable and requires the medication to be replaced.

(f) The department and its contracted health
plans shall not require any individual stable on a brand-name anti-anxiety
medication on or before July 1, 2010, to transfer to a different anti-anxiety
medication, generic or brand-name, unless the individual's condition becomes
unstable and requires the medication to be replaced.

(g) The department and its medicaid managed
care contracted health plans shall have the authority to investigate fraud,
abuse, or misconduct.

(h) The department shall report to the
legislature no later than twenty days before the convening of each regular
session on:

(1) The number of brand-name and generic
prescriptions written to which this section applies; and

(2) The amount expended on brand-name prescriptions
and the amount expended on generic prescriptions written each fiscal year to
which this section applies.

(i) All psychotropic medications covered by
this section shall be prescribed by a psychiatrist, a physician, or an advanced
practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority under chapter 457 and
duly licensed in the State.

(j) As used in this section:

"Anti-anxiety medication" means those
medications included in the United States Pharmacopeia's anxiolytic therapeutic
category.

"Antidepressant medication" means
those medications included in the United States Pharmacopeia's antidepressant
therapeutic category.

"Antipsychotic medication" means
those medications included in the United States Pharmacopeia's antipsychotic
therapeutic category.

"Psychotropic medication" means only antipsychotic,
antidepressant, or anti-anxiety medications approved by the United States Food
and Drug Administration for the treatment of mental or emotional disorders. [L
2005, c 239, pt of §2, §5; am L 2006, c 311, pt of §2, §3; am L 2007, c 39, §§1,
2; am L 2010, c 205, §§2, 9; am L 2012, c 120, §2; am L 2015, c 20, §§6, 7]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next